Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All public schools shall observe Constitution Day under this section.
(2) On September 17 of each year, or one (1) of the five (5) school days preceding
September 17, one (1) class or instructional period shall be devoted to the
observance of Constitution Day.
(3) A Constitution Day program shall provide instruction, in a classroom or assembly
setting, that at a minimum consists of:
(a) A timeline of events leading to the creation of the Constitution of the United
States;
(b) The contents of the Constitution of the United States; and
(c) A brief demonstration of how students can locate the text of the
fundamental American documents and speeches identified in KRS
158.196(3)(a).
(4) School districts are encouraged to collaborate with the entities referenced in
subsection (6) of this section to provide eighth grade students with a pocket size
edition of the Constitution of the United States at no cost to the district.
(5) The department shall develop and maintain a web-based resource for
Constitution Day programming to be provided to all public schools no later than
August 1 of each year. The resource shall include but not be limited to sample
lesson plans and activities.
(6) To develop a Constitution Day program, public schools are encouraged to seek
advice or resources for programming from:
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 11/10/2025 3:00 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 461
(a) The department's web-based Constitution Day resource, as identified in
subsection (5) of this section;
(b) The Kentucky Historical Society;
(c) The Department for Libraries and Archives; and
(d) Civic service organizations including but not limited to the Daughters of the
American Revolution, the National Society of the Sons of the American
Revolution, and the 917 Society.
(7) The department shall encourage schools certified under KRS 156.160(2) to
participate in the observation of Constitution Day in accordance with this section.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as the Honoring Our Constitution Act.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 11/10/2025 3:00 PM Jacketed